Mississippi statutes. Title 17. Local Government; Provisions Common to Counties and Municipalities
Article 1. Exemptions.

§ 17-21-1.
Exemption from ad valorem taxes for real property of nonprofit industrial or economic development organizations.

The board of supervisors of any county and the governing authorities of any municipality are authorized and empowered, in their discretion, to grant exemptions from ad valorem taxes on real property:

Which is owned by a nonprofit industrial foundation, corporation or like association organized and operated for the public purpose of promoting economic and industrial development; and

Which is acquired for the sole purpose of making sites available for industrial development; and

When no part of the income thereof inures to the benefit of any private stockholder or individual.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 506, § 1, eff from and after May 1, 1981.

§ 17-21-3.
Termination of exemption; exemption inapplicable to real estate with building thereon.

The exemptions provided by Sections 17-21-1 and 17-21-3 if granted by the board of supervisors or the governing authorities of any municipality may be withdrawn or terminated as to any subsequent year and any exemptions granted pursuant to Sections 17-21-1 and 17-21-3 on real property which is subsequently leased or sold by the nonprofit industrial foundation, corporation or like association shall be terminated and such real property shall then be assessed for ad valorem taxation as other taxable property. The terms and provisions of Sections 17-21-1 and 17-21-3 shall not apply to any real estate having a building located thereon.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 506, § 2, eff from and after May 1, 1981.

§ 17-21-5.
Exemption from municipal ad valorem tax for certain structures in central business districts, historic preservation districts, business improvement districts, urban renewal districts, redevelopment districts, or on historic landmarks; application for exemption.

The governing authorities of any municipality of this state may, in their discretion, exempt from any or all municipal ad valorem taxes, excluding ad valorem taxes for school district purposes, for a period of not more than seven (7) years, any privately owned new structures and any new renovations of and improvements to existing structures lying within a designated central business district or historic preservation district or on a historic landmark site, as determined by the municipality, but only in the event such structures shall have been constructed, renovated or improved pursuant to the requirements of an approved project of the municipality for the development of the central business district and/or the preservation and revitalization of historic landmark sites or historic preservation districts. The tax exemption authorized herein may be granted only after written application has been made to the governing authorities of the municipality by any person, firm or corporation claiming the exemption, and an order passed by the governing authorities of such municipality finding that the construction, renovation or improvement of said property is for the promotion of business, commerce or industry in the designated central business district or for the promotion of historic preservation.

The governing authorities of any municipality of this state with a population of twenty thousand (20,000) or more according to the latest federal decennial census, may, in their discretion, exempt from any or all municipal ad valorem taxes, excluding ad valorem taxes for school district purposes, for a period of not more than seven (7) years, any privately owned new structures and any new renovations of and improvements to existing structures lying within a designated business improvement district, urban renewal district or redevelopment district, as determined by the municipality, but only in the event such structures shall have been constructed, renovated or improved pursuant to the requirements of an approved project of the municipality for the development of the business improvement district, urban renewal district or redevelopment district. The tax exemption authorized herein may be granted only after written application has been made to the governing authorities of the municipality by any person, firm or corporation claiming the exemption, and an order passed by the governing authorities of such municipality finding that the construction, renovation or improvement of said property is for the promotion of business, commerce or industry in the designated business improvement district, urban renewal district or redevelopment district.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 512, § 1; Laws, 1988, ch. 454; Laws, 1989, ch. 461, § 1; Laws, 1996, ch. 522, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1996; Laws, 2018, ch. 436, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§ 17-21-7.
Exemption from county ad valorem taxes for certain central business district structures; application for exemption.

The board of supervisors of any county wherein there is located a municipality described in Section 17-21-5 may, in its discretion, exempt from any or all county ad valorem taxes, excluding ad valorem taxes for school district purposes, for a period of not more than seven (7) years, any privately owned new structures and any new renovations of and improvements to existing structures where an exemption has been granted by the municipality in accordance with the provisions of Section 17-21-5. The exemption from county ad valorem taxes may be granted only upon written application to the board of supervisors of the county by any person, firm or corporation claiming the exemption. A copy of the order of the governing authority of the municipality granting an exemption from municipal ad valorem taxes shall be attached to the application as an exhibit thereto.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 512, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved April 20, 1981).